New York, session 2025-2026, S1457.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraphs a and b of subdivision 3 of section 467-b of the 2 real property tax law, paragraph a as amended by section 1 of part U of 3 chapter 55 of the laws of 2014 and paragraph b as amended by chapter 129 4 of the laws of 2014, are amended to read as follows: 5 a. for a dwelling unit where the head of the household is a person 6 sixty-two years of age or older, no tax abatement shall be granted if 7 the combined income of all members of the household for the income tax EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04145-08-6 S. 1457--B 2 1 year immediately preceding the date of making application exceeds four 2 thousand dollars, or such other sum not more than twenty-five thousand 3 dollars beginning July first, two thousand five, twenty-six thousand 4 dollars beginning July first, two thousand six, twenty-seven thousand 5 dollars beginning July first, two thousand seven, twenty-eight thousand 6 dollars beginning July first, two thousand eight, twenty-nine thousand 7 dollars beginning July first, two thousand nine, [and] fifty thousand 8 dollars beginning July first, two thousand fourteen, and seventy-five 9 thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand twenty-six, as may 10 be provided by the local law, ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant 11 to this section, provided that when the head of the household retires 12 before the commencement of such income tax year and the date of filing 13 the application, the income for such year may be adjusted by excluding 14 salary or earnings and projecting [his or her] such head of household's 15 retirement income over the entire period of such year. The maximum 16 income threshold provided for herein shall be increased by order of the 17 commissioner of the state division of housing and community renewal to 18 reflect any increase in the consumer price index for all urban consumers 19 for all items as published by the United States bureau of labor statis- 20 tics for the region in which the housing accommodation is located, as 21 established for the most recent preceding calendar year as shall be 22 published by the division of housing and community renewal no later than 23 the first of July in any given year, provided that for New York city and 24 any municipality that adopts a local law, ordinance or resolution 25 providing for the abatement of taxes pursuant to this section in the 26 counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, Rockland, Suffolk, and 27 Westchester, such consumer price index shall be the New York-Newark-Jer- 28 sey City, NY-NJ-PA consumer price index (CPI-U), and provided further 29 that for any other municipality that adopts a local law, ordinance or 30 resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursuant to this 31 section, such consumer price index shall be the Northeast Region consum- 32 er price index. 33 b. for a dwelling unit where the head of the household qualifies as a 34 person with a disability pursuant to subdivision five of this section, 35 no tax abatement shall be granted if the combined income for all members 36 of the household for the current income tax year exceeds [fifty] seven- 37 ty-five thousand dollars beginning July first, two thousand [fourteen] 38 twenty-six, as may be provided by the local law, ordinance or resolution 39 adopted pursuant to this section. The maximum income threshold provided 40 for herein shall be increased by order of the commissioner of the state 41 division of housing and community renewal to reflect any increase in the 42 consumer price index for all urban consumers for all items as published 43 by the United States bureau of labor statistics for the region in which 44 the housing accommodation is located, as established for the most recent 45 preceding calendar year as shall be published by the division of housing 46 and community renewal no later than the first of July in any given year, 47 provided that for New York city and any municipality that adopts a local 48 law, ordinance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursu- 49 ant to this section in the counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, 50 Rockland, Suffolk, and Westchester, such consumer price index shall be 51 the New York-Newark-Jersey City, NY-NJ-PA consumer price index (CPI-U), 52 and provided further that for any other municipality that adopts a local 53 law, ordinance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursu- 54 ant to this section, such consumer price index shall be the Northeast 55 Region consumer price index. S. 1457--B 3 1 § 2. Paragraphs d and m of subdivision 1 of section 467-c of the real 2 property tax law, paragraph d as separately amended by chapters 188 and 3 205 of the laws of 2005, subparagraph 1 of paragraph d as amended by 4 section 2 of part U of chapter 55 of the laws of 2014 and paragraph m as 5 amended by chapter 129 of the laws of 2014, are amended to read as 6 follows: 7 d. "Eligible head of the household" means (1) a person or [his or her] 8 such person's spouse who is sixty-two years of age or older and is enti- 9 tled to the possession or to the use and occupancy of a dwelling unit, 10 provided, however, with respect to a dwelling which was subject to a 11 mortgage insured or initially insured by the federal government pursuant 12 to section two hundred thirteen of the National Housing Act, as amended 13 "eligible head of the household" shall be limited to that person or [his 14 or her] such person's spouse who was entitled to possession or the use 15 and occupancy of such dwelling unit at the time of termination of such 16 mortgage, and whose income when combined with the income of all other 17 members of the household, does not exceed six thousand five hundred 18 dollars for the taxable period, or such other sum not less than sixty- 19 five hundred dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand dollars begin- 20 ning July first, two thousand five, twenty-six thousand dollars begin- 21 ning July first, two thousand six, twenty-seven thousand dollars 22 beginning July first, two thousand seven, twenty-eight thousand dollars 23 beginning July first, two thousand eight, twenty-nine thousand dollars 24 beginning July first, two thousand nine, [and] fifty thousand dollars 25 beginning July first, two thousand fourteen, and seventy-five thousand 26 dollars beginning July first, two thousand twenty-six, as may be 27 provided by local law; or (2) a person with a disability as defined in 28 this subdivision. The maximum income threshold provided for herein 29 shall be increased by order of the commissioner of the state division of 30 housing and community renewal to reflect any increase in the consumer 31 price index for all urban consumers for all items as published by the 32 United States bureau of labor statistics for the region in which the 33 housing accommodation is located, as established for the most recent 34 preceding calendar year as shall be published by the division of housing 35 and community renewal no later than the first of July in any given year, 36 provided that for New York city and any municipality that adopts a local 37 law, ordinance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursu- 38 ant to this section in the counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, 39 Rockland, Suffolk, and Westchester, such consumer price index shall be 40 the New York-Newark-Jersey City, NY-NJ-PA consumer price index (CPI-U), 41 and provided further that for any other municipality that adopts a local 42 law, ordinance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursu- 43 ant to this section, such consumer price index shall be the Northeast 44 Region consumer price index. 45 m. "Person with a disability" means an individual who is currently 46 receiving social security disability insurance (SSDI) or supplemental 47 security income (SSI) benefits under the federal social security act or 48 disability pension or disability compensation benefits provided by the 49 United States department of veterans affairs or those previously eligi- 50 ble by virtue of receiving disability benefits under the supplemental 51 security income program or the social security disability program and 52 currently receiving medical assistance benefits based on determination 53 of disability as provided in section three hundred sixty-six of the 54 social services law and whose income for the current income tax year, 55 together with the income of all members of such individual's household, 56 does not exceed [fifty] seventy-five thousand dollars beginning July S. 1457--B 4 1 first, two thousand [fourteen] twenty-six, as may be provided by local 2 law. The maximum income threshold provided for herein shall be 3 increased by order of the commissioner of the state division of housing 4 and community renewal to reflect any increase in the consumer price 5 index for all urban consumers for all items as published by the United 6 States bureau of labor statistics for the region in which the housing 7 accommodation is located, as established for the most recent preceding 8 calendar year as shall be published by the division of housing and 9 community renewal no later than the first of July in any given year, 10 provided that for New York city and any municipality that adopts a local 11 law, ordinance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursu- 12 ant to this section in the counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, 13 Rockland, Suffolk, and Westchester, such consumer price index shall be 14 the New York-Newark-Jersey City, NY-NJ-PA consumer price index (CPI-U), 15 and provided further that for any other municipality that adopts a local 16 law, ordinance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursu- 17 ant to this section, such consumer price index shall be the Northeast 18 Region consumer price index. 19 § 3. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 3 of section 467 20 of the real property tax law, as amended by section 2 of part K of chap- 21 ter 59 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 22 (i) if the income of the owner or the combined income of the owners of 23 the property for the applicable income tax year exceeds the sum of three 24 thousand dollars, or such other sum not less than three thousand dollars 25 nor more than [fifty] seventy-five thousand dollars beginning July 26 first, two thousand twenty-six, as may be provided by the local law, 27 ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section. The maximum 28 income threshold provided for herein shall be increased by order of the 29 commissioner to reflect any increase in the consumer price index for all 30 urban consumers for all items as published by the United States bureau 31 of labor statistics for the region in which the housing accommodation is 32 located, as established for the most recent preceding calendar year as 33 shall be published by the division of housing and community renewal no 34 later than the first of July in any given year, provided that for New 35 York city and any municipality that adopts a local law, ordinance or 36 resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursuant to this section 37 in the counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, Rockland, Suffolk, 38 and Westchester, such consumer price index shall be the New York-Ne- 39 wark-Jersey City, NY-NJ-PA consumer price index (CPI-U), and provided 40 further that for any other municipality that adopts a local law, ordi- 41 nance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursuant to 42 this section, such consumer price index shall be the Northeast Region 43 consumer price index. 44 § 4. Subparagraph (i) of paragraph (a) of subdivision 5 of section 45 459-c of the real property tax law, as amended by section 8 of part K of 46 chapter 59 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as follows: 47 (i) if the income of the owner or the combined income of the owners of 48 the property for the applicable income tax year exceeds the sum of three 49 thousand dollars, or such other sum not less than three thousand dollars 50 nor more than [fifty] seventy-five thousand dollars beginning July 51 first, two thousand twenty-six, as may be provided by the local law or 52 resolution adopted pursuant to this section. The maximum income thresh- 53 old provided for herein shall be increased by order of the commissioner 54 to reflect any increase in the consumer price index for all urban 55 consumers for all items as published by the United States bureau of 56 labor statistics for the region in which the housing accommodation is S. 1457--B 5 1 located, as established for the most recent preceding calendar year as 2 shall be published by the division of housing and community renewal no 3 later than the first of July in any given year, provided that for New 4 York city and any municipality that adopts a local law, ordinance or 5 resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursuant to this section 6 in the counties of Dutchess, Nassau, Orange, Putnam, Rockland, Suffolk, 7 and Westchester, such consumer price index shall be the New York-Ne- 8 wark-Jersey City, NY-NJ-PA consumer price index (CPI-U), and provided 9 further that for any other municipality that adopts a local law, ordi- 10 nance or resolution providing for the abatement of taxes pursuant to 11 this section, such consumer price index shall be the Northeast Region 12 consumer price index. 13 § 5. Section 4 of part U of chapter 55 of the laws of 2014, amending 14 the real property tax law relating to the tax abatement and exemption 15 for rent regulated and rent controlled property occupied by senior citi- 16 zens, as amended by chapter 144 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read 17 as follows: 18 § 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2014[, and sections one and 19 two of this act shall expire and be deemed repealed June 30, 2026; 20 provided that the amendment to section 467-b of the real property tax 21 law made by section one of this act shall not affect the expiration of 22 such section and shall be deemed to expire therewith]. 23 § 6. Section 4 of chapter 129 of the laws of 2014, amending the real 24 property tax law relating to the tax abatement and exemption for rent 25 regulated and rent controlled property occupied by persons with disabil- 26 ities, as amended by chapter 144 of the laws of 2024, is amended to read 27 as follows: 28 § 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2014 [provided, however, that: 29 (a) the amendments to paragraph b of subdivision 3 of section 467-b of 30 the real property tax law made by section one of this act shall be 31 subject to the expiration and reversion of such subdivision pursuant to 32 section 17 of chapter 576 of the laws of 1974, as amended, when upon 33 such date the provisions of section two of this act shall take effect; 34 and 35 (b) nothing contained in this act shall be construed so as to extend 36 the provisions of this act beyond June 30, 2026, when upon such date 37 this act shall expire and the provisions contained in this act shall be 38 deemed repealed]. 39 § 7. This act shall take effect immediately.